Washington statutes.
RCW 18.50.060

Examinations—Times and places—Subjects—Issuance of license.

(1) The secretary is hereby authorized and empowered to execute the provisions of this chapter and shall offer examinations in midwifery at least twice a year at such times and places as the secretary may select. The examinations shall be written and shall be in the English language.

(2) The secretary, with the assistance of the midwifery advisory committee, shall develop or approve a licensure examination in the subjects that the secretary determines are within the scope of and commensurate with the work performed by a licensed midwife. The examination shall be sufficient to test the scientific and practical fitness of candidates to practice midwifery. All application papers shall be deposited with the secretary and there retained for at least one year, when they may be destroyed.

(3) If the examination is satisfactorily completed, the secretary shall issue to such candidate a license entitling the candidate to practice midwifery in the state of Washington.

[ 1991 c 3 s 109; 1987 c 467 s 4; 1981 c 53 s 8; 1979 c 158 s 43; 1917 c 160 s 4; RRS s 10177.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1981 c 53: See note following RCW 18.50.005.